sk-SK: Komponenty opravárskej súpravy: Lepidlo; Alkoholové obrúsky; Štetec na nanášanie; Puzdro na prenášanie; Návod na použitie; Záplaty; Adaptér na pumpu; Brúsny papier; Diely na opravu ventilov; Iné
ro-RO: Componente kit de reparații: Adeziv; Șervețele cu alcool; Pensulă aplicatoare; Carcasă de transport; Manual de instrucțiuni; Petice; Adaptor de pompă; Șmirghel; Piese pentru repararea supapelor; Altele
sv: Reparationssats – komponenter: Lim; Alkoholservetter; Appliceringsborste; Bärväska; Bruksanvisning; Lagningslappar; Pumpadapter; Sandpapper; Delar för ventilreparation; Annat
zh-TW: 修補套件組件: 黏著劑; 酒精擦拭片; 塗抹刷; 手提箱; 說明手冊; 修補片; 打氣筒轉接頭; 砂紙; 氣門修補零件; 其他
fi: Korjauspakkauksen osat: Liima; Alkoholipyyhkeet; Levityssivellin; Kantokotelo; Ohjekirja; Paikat; Pumppusovitin; Hiekkapaperi; Venttiilin korjausosat; Muu
tr: Tamir kit bileşenleri: Yapıştırıcı; Alkollü mendiller; Uygulama fırçası; Taşıma çantası; Kullanım kılavuzu; Yamalar; Pompa adaptörü; Zımpara kağıdı; Valf tamir parçaları; Diğer
bg-BG: Компоненти на ремонтния комплект: Лепило; Спиртни кърпички; Четка за нанасяне; Кутия за пренасяне; Ръководство за употреба; Лепенки; Адаптер за помпа; Шкурка; Части за ремонт на вентили; Други
hr-HR: Popravak kompletnih komponenti: Ljepilo; Alkoholne maramice; Kist za nanošenje; Kutija za nošenje; Priručnik s uputama; Zakrpe; Adapter za pumpu; Brusni papir; Dijelovi za popravak ventila; Ostalo
zh-CN: 修补套件组件: 粘合剂; 酒精湿巾; 涂抹刷; 便携包; 使用手册; 贴片; 泵适配器; 砂纸; 阀门维修零件; 其他
nb: Komponenter i reparasjonssett: Lim; Alkoholservietter; Påføringsbørste; Bæreveske; Instruksjonsmanual; Lapper; Pumpeadapter; Sandpapir; Deler for ventilreparasjon; Annet
fr: Composants du kit de réparation: Adhésif; Lingettes alcoolisées; Pinceau applicateur; Étui de transport; Manuel d’instructions; Patchs; Adaptateur de pompe; Papier de verre; Pièces de réparation de valve; Autre
ko: 수리 키트 구성품: 접착제; 알코올 물티슈; 어플리케이터 브러시; 휴대용 케이스; 사용 설명서; 패치; 펌프 어댑터; 사포; 밸브 수리 부품; 기타
da: Reparationssæts komponenter: Klæbemiddel; Alkoholservietter; Påføringspensel; Bæretaske; Brugsanvisning; Lapper; Pumpeadapter; Sandpapir; Ventilreparationsdele; Andet
vi: Các thành phần của bộ dụng cụ sửa chữa: Keo dán; Khăn tẩm cồn; Cọ quét; Hộp đựng; Tài liệu hướng dẫn; Miếng vá; Đầu nối bơm; Giấy nhám; Bộ phận sửa chữa van; Khác
de: Komponenten des Reparatursets: Klebstoff; Alkoholtücher; Applikatorpinsel; Tragetasche; Bedienungsanleitung; Flicken; Pumpenadapter; Schleifpapier; Ventilreparaturteile; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Remonto rinkinio komponentai: Klijai; Alkoholinės servetėlės; Aplikatoriaus šepetėlis; Nešiojimo dėklas; Naudojimo instrukcija; Lopai; Pompos adapteris; Švitrinis popierius; Vožtuvo taisymo dalys; Kita
cs: Součásti opravné sady: Lepidlo; Alkoholové ubrousky; Štětec na nanášení; Přenosné pouzdro; Návod k použití; Záplaty; Adaptér k pumpě; Brusný papír; Díly na opravu ventilků; Jiné
pl: Zestaw naprawczy komponentów: Klej; Chusteczki alkoholowe; Pędzelek do aplikacji; Etui transportowe; Instrukcja obsługi; Łaty; Adapter do pompki; Papier ścierny; Części do naprawy zaworów; Inne
pt-BR: Reparo kit componentes: Adesivo; Lenços umedecidos com álcool; Pincel aplicador; Estojo de transporte; Manual de instruções; Remendos; Adaptador de bomba; Lixa; Peças para reparo de válvulas; Outro
hu: Javítókészlet komponensei: Ragasztó; Alkoholos törlőkendők; Applikátor ecset; Hordtáska; Használati útmutató; Foltok; Pumpaadapter; Csiszolópapír; Szelepjavító alkatrészek; Egyéb
el: Εξαρτήματα του κιτ επισκευής: Κόλλα; Μαντηλάκια οινοπνεύματος; Πινέλο εφαρμογής; Θήκη μεταφοράς; Εγχειρίδιο οδηγιών; Μπαλώματα; Αντάπτορας τρόμπας; Γυαλόχαρτο; Ανταλλακτικά επισκευής βαλβίδων; Άλλο
es: Componentes del kit de reparación: Adhesivo; Toallitas con alcohol; Pincel aplicador; Estuche de transporte; Manual de instrucciones; Parches; Adaptador de bomba; Papel de lija; Piezas de repuesto para válvulas; Otro
sl-SI: Komponente kompleta za popravilo: Lepilo; Alkoholni robčki; Čopič za nanašanje; Torbica za prenašanje; Navodila za uporabo; Zaplate; Nastavek za tlačilko; Brusni papir; Deli za popravilo ventilov; Drugo
en: Repair kit components: Adhesive; Alcohol wipes; Applicator brush; Carrying case; Instruction manual; Patches; Pump adapter; Sandpaper; Valve repair parts; Other
ru: Компоненты ремонтного комплекта: Клей; Спиртовые салфетки; Кисточка для нанесения; Футляр для переноски; Руководство по эксплуатации; Заплатки; Переходник для насоса; Наждачная бумага; Детали для ремонта клапана; Другое
nl: Reparatieset onderdelen: Lijm; Alcoholdoekjes; Aanbrengkwast; Draagtas; Handleiding; Patches; Pompadapter; Schuurpapier; Ventielreparatieonderdelen; Overig
it: Componenti del kit di riparazione: Adesivo; Salviette imbevute di alcol; Pennello applicatore; Custodia da trasporto; Manuale di istruzioni; Toppe; Adattatore per pompa; Carta vetrata; Parti per riparazione valvole; Altro
th: ส่วนประกอบของชุดซ่อม: กาว; แผ่นเช็ดทำความสะอาดแอลกอฮอล์; แปรงทา; กระเป๋าพกพา; คู่มือคำแนะนำ; แผ่นปะ; อะแดปเตอร์ปั๊ม; กระดาษทราย; อะไหลซ่อมวาล์ว; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Componentes do kit de reparação: Adesivo; Toalhetes com álcool; Pincel aplicador; Estojo de transporte; Manual de instruções; Remendos; Adaptador de bomba; Lixa; Peças de reparação de válvulas; Outros
ja: 修理キットの構成部品: 接着剤; アルコールワイプ; アプリケーターブラシ; キャリングケース; 取扱説明書; パッチ; ポンプアダプター; サンドペーパー; バルブ修理部品; その他